es: Forma del tacón: Bloque; Grueso; Cono; Cubano; Acampanado; Kitten; Carrete; Aguja; Otra
it: Forma del tacco: A blocco; Grosso; A cono; Cubano; Svasato; Kitten; A rocchetto; A spillo; Altro
sk-SK: Tvar podpätku: Kockový; Hrubý; Kužeľový; Kubánsky; Rozšírený; Nízky (kitten); Cievkový; Ihličkový; Iné
de: Absatzform: Block; Chunky; Kegel; Kubanisch; Ausgestellt; Kitten; Spule; Stiletto; Sonstige
nb: Hælform: Blokk; Tykk; Kjegle; Cubansk; Utsvingt; Kitten; Spole; Stilett; Annet
tr: Topuk şekli: Blok; Kalın; Koni; Küba; İspanyol; Kısa ve ince; Makara; Stiletto; Diğer
sv: Klackform: Block; Grov; Konformad; Kubansk; Utsvängd; Kitten; Spolformad; Stilett; Övrigt
pt-BR: Formato do salto: Bloco; Grosso; Cone; Cubano; Sino; Kitten; Carretel; Agulha; Outro
da: Form på hælen: Blok; Chunky; Kegle; Cubansk; Svaj; Kitten; Spole; Stilet; Andet
bg-BG: Форма на тока: Блок; Масивен; Конус; Кубински; Разширяващ се; Котешко токче; Тип макара; Стилето; Други
cs: Tvar podpatku: Blokový; Masivní; Kuželový; Kubánský; Rozšířený; Kitten; Cívkový; Jehlový; Jiný
pt-PT: Forma de salto: Bloco; Robusto; Cone; Cubano; Alargado; Kitten; Carretel; Estilete; Outro
th: รูปทรงส้นรองเท้า: ส้นตึก; ส้นหนา; ทรงกรวย; ส้นคิวบัน; ทรงบานออก; ส้นเตี้ย; ทรงหลอด; ส้นเข็ม; อื่นๆ
ko: 힐 Shapes: 블록; 청키; 원뿔형; 쿠반; 플레어; 키튼; 스풀; 스틸레토; 기타
pl: Kształt obcasa: Klockowy; Gruby; Stożkowy; Kubański; Rozszerzany; Kaczuszka; Ludwik; Szpilka; Inny
el: Στυλ ύψους τακουνιού: Τετράγωνο; Χοντρό; Κώνος; Κουβανέζικο; Καμπάνα; Kitten; Καρούλι; Στιλέτο; Άλλο
nl: Hak vorm: Blok; Grof; Kegel; Cubaans; Uitlopend; Kitten; Spoel; Stiletto; Overig
en: Heel shape: Block; Chunky; Cone; Cuban; Flared; Kitten; Spool; Stiletto; Other
fr: Forme du talon: Carré; Épais; Cône; Cubain; Évasé; Kitten; Bobine; Aiguille; Autre
hu: Sarokkialakítás: Tömbsarok; Vaskos; Kúpos; Kubai; Kiszélesedő; Törpesarok; Spulni; Tűsarok; Egyéb
lt-LT: Kulno forma: Kvadratinis; Stambus; Kūgio formos; Kubietiškas; Platėjantis; Mažas („Kitten“); Ritės formos; Smailiakulnis („Stiletto“); Kita
zh-CN: 鞋跟形状: 方跟; 粗跟; 锥形跟; 古巴跟; 喇叭跟; 猫跟; 马蹄跟; 细高跟; 其他
ro-RO: Forme de pantofi cu toc: Gros; Masiv; Conic; Cubanez; Evazat; Kitten; Mosor; Stiletto; Altele
ja: ヒールのShapes: ブロック; チャンキー; コーン; キューバン; フレア; キトゥン; スプール; スティレット; その他
hr-HR: Oblik pete: Blok; Debela; Konusna; Kubanska; Zvonolika; Kitten; Kalem; Stiletto; Ostalo
ru: Форма каблука: Широкий каблук; Массивный; Конусовидный; Кубинский; Расклешенный; Рюмочка (Kitten heel); В виде катушки; Шпилька; Другое
vi: Hình dạng gót giày: Gót vuông; Gót thô; Gót hình nón; Gót kiểu Cuba; Gót loe; Gót thấp; Gót lõm; Gót nhọn; Khác
fi: Koron muoto: Palakorko; Paksu; Kartio; Kuubalainen; Levenevä; Kissankorko; Rullakorko; Piikkikorko; Muu
zh-TW: 鞋跟形狀: 粗跟; 厚底跟; 錐形跟; 古巴跟; 喇叭跟; 小貓跟; 紡錘跟; 細高跟; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika pete: Blok; Debela; Stožčasta; Kubanska; Zvončasta; Nizka tanka; Tuljava; Stiletto; Drugo